South Dakota, session 2026, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 20-13-59 be AMENDED:
20-13-59. Except as otherwise provided in this section and §§ 13-32-22 and 13-
32-23, the state or a political subdivision of this state must designate, as being for the
exclusive use of females or males, any multi-occupancy changing room, restroom, or
sleeping quarters in:
(1) A building or facility owned by the state or by a political subdivision of this state;
or
(2) A space leased to or occupied by the state or by a political subdivision of this state.
This section does not apply to any room used exclusively by firefighters or law
enforcement personnel acting in an official capacity.
Section 2. That § 20-13-61 be AMENDED:
20-13-61. The prohibitions set forth in § 20-13-60 do not apply to:
(1) An individual who accompanies a child under the age of ten, if the individual is the
child's parent or lawful chaperone;
(2) An individual who accompanies another individual requiring assistance because of
age or a disability;
(3) A law enforcement officer, fire official, firefighter, or other employee of the state
or a political subdivision who is acting in an official capacity;
(4) An individual providing emergency medical assistance;
(5) An individual providing custodial, maintenance, or inspection services, provided the
changing room or restroom is unoccupied; or
(6) An individual providing services or rendering aid:

26.733.19 2 1161
(a) During a natural disaster or declared emergency; or
(b) When necessary to maintain order and safety.
HB1161 ENROLLED

26.733.19 3 1161
An Act to amend provisions related to changing rooms, sleeping quarters, and restrooms.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1161
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1161 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1161 ENROLLED